Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.706

Derivative action.

A partner may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership if:

(1) The partner first makes a demand on the general partners, requesting that they cause the limited partnership to bring an action to enforce the right, and the general partners do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

(2) A demand would be futile.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1002.]